Illinois, session 104th, HB5363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.214 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.214 new)7    Sec. 2-3.214. Grants to ACT Now; ACT Now pipeline 8services.9    (a) The purpose of this Section is to:10        (1) Ensure high-quality educational opportunities and 11    improved educational outcomes for all students through 12    investment in sustainable community schools.13        (2) Use the authority of state legislative bodies to 14    support and fund the planning, development, 15    implementation, and evaluation of full-service community 16    schools.17        (3) Elevate full-service community schools as a 18    comprehensive solution to problems facing public schools, 19    especially in low-income communities.20        (4) Document and evaluate lessons learned from 21    community schools programs to develop a set of best 22    practices to be shared locally, statewide, and nationwide.23        (5) Elevate community schools as an important   HB5363- 2 -LRB104 19313 LNS 32759 b1    component of a viable long-term public safety strategy 2    that reduces and prevents crimes through the provision of 3    community resources and better academic outcomes.4        (6) Sustain funding for full-service community schools 5    interrupted by federal funding withholding.6    (b) As used in this Section:7    "ACT Now" means the Afterschool for Children and Teens Now 8Coalition.9    "Full-service community school" means a public elementary 10school or secondary school that:11        (1) participates in a community-based effort to 12    coordinate and integrate educational, developmental, 13    family, health, and other comprehensive services through 14    community-based organizations and public and private 15    partnerships; and16        (2) provides access to such services in school to 17    students, families, and the community, such as access 18    during the school year, including before and after school 19    hours and weekends, as well as during the summer.20    "Pipeline services" means a continuum of coordinated 21supports, services, and opportunities for children from birth 22through entry into and success in postsecondary education, and 23career attainment. "Pipeline services" includes, at a minimum, 24strategies to address, through services or programs, including 25integrated student supports, the following:26        (1) High-quality early childhood education programs.  HB5363- 3 -LRB104 19313 LNS 32759 b1        (2) High-quality school and out-of-school time 2    programs and strategies.3        (3) Support for a child's transition to elementary 4    school, from elementary school to middle school, from 5    middle school to high school, and from high school into 6    and through postsecondary education and into the 7    workforce, including any comprehensive readiness 8    assessment determined necessary.9        (4) Family and community engagement and supports, 10    including engaging or supporting families at school or at 11    home.12        (5) Activities that support postsecondary and 13    workforce readiness, including job training, internship 14    opportunities, and career counseling.15        (6) Community-based support for students who have 16    attended the schools in the area served by the pipeline, 17    or students who are members of the community, facilitating 18    their continued connection to the community and success in 19    postsecondary education and the workforce.20        (7) Social, health, nutrition, and mental health 21    services and supports.22        (8) Juvenile crime prevention and rehabilitation 23    programs.24    (c) The State Board of Education shall make grants 25available for community schools separate and apart from any 26federal appropriations to be issued to ACT Now through its   HB5363- 4 -LRB104 19313 LNS 32759 b1fiscal sponsor Metropolitan Family Services and disbursed to 232 partner schools in this State.3    (d) All ACT Now partner schools must develop plans for 4implementing community schools that include activities in all 5of the pipeline services.6    (e) ACT Now partner schools must submit data on services 7designated by ACT Now annually to the State Board of 8Education.9    (f) ACT Now partner schools must submit all oversight and 10accounting procedures established by ACT Now to the State 11Board of Education.12    (g) ACT Now must conduct technical assistance services, 13provide professional development to schools and partners, and 14conduct an annual evaluation of a grant awarded by the State 15Board of Education under subsection (c). 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.